Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. 2013 Iowa Acts, chapter 121, section 73, subsection 2, is amended to read as follows: 2. The department shall develop an achievement score that calculates aggregate growth as well as aggregate proficiency of students which when combined with other academic indicators results in an overall school performance grade for each attendance center in the school district. For purposes of calculating the performance grade, if a student returns to the school after dropping out and subsequently drops out again, the studentâs second or subsequent dropping out of school shall not adversely affect the schoolâs performance grade. The performance grade may also be used as one measure to rank and classify schools into six different performance categories: exceptional, high performing, commendable, acceptable, needs improvement, and priority. The categories may be used to define support and specialized assistance to schools classified as needs improvement or priority as well as to recognize schools designated exceptional or high performing. Additionally, a closing gap score shall be calculated as another measure to determine subgroup performance and to rank and classify attendance centers. Other academic indicators House File 393, p. 2 shall be defined as criterion referenced variables that will be utilized in the calculation of the performance grade. Other academic indicators shall include but not be limited to graduation rates, attendance rates, and college-readiness rates. Additional indicators of academic success and progress may include post-graduation data, suspension and expulsion rates, levels of student engagement, parent satisfaction, parent engagement, and staff working conditions. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 393, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor